apertium-kum.kum.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я

 %{A%}:а ! %{A%}:е
 %{I%}:ы ! %{I%}:и %{I%}:у %{I%}:ю
 %{D%}:д 
 %{N%}:н
 %{E%}:а ! %{E%}:е %{E%}:й
 %{r%}:р
 %{s%}:с
 %{n%}:н
 %{y%}:у
 %{l%}:л ! %{l%}:н
 %{ъ%}:ъ ! %{ъ%}:0
 %{ң%}:0
 %{и%}:и
 %{е%}:е

 %{э%}:0 
 %{а%}:0 
 %{о%}:0 
 %{ү%}:0 
 %{й%}:0 
 %{н%}:0 
 %{з%}:0 
 %{т%}:0 


 %{❗%}:0
 %{☭%}:0
 
 %>:0
 % 
 %-
 %+   ;

Sets

Vow = а э и о у А Э И О У     ! Уь Оь 
      я е ы ё ю Я Е Ы Ё Ю     ! уь Оь
      %{а%} %{э%} %{о%} %{ү%} ;

Cns =  Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ
       б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ; 

Nasals = н м
         Н М ;

FrontVow = и е э
           И Е Э 
           %{э%} %{ү%} ; !! leave out front-rounded vowels ё/оь and ю/уь!

BackVow = а ы у о
          А Ы У О 
           %{а%} %{о%} ;

RdVow = о у
        О У
        %{о%} %{ү%} ;

RdYotVow = ё ю
           Ё Ю ;

FrontUnroundVow = е э и
                  Е Э И %{э%} ;

! FrontRoundVow = ё ю   ! оь
!                 Ё Ю ; ! Оь

BackUnroundVow = а ы
                 А Ы %{а%} ;

! BackRoundVow = о у
!                О У ;

YotVow = Я я Е е Ё ё Ю ю ;  ! BEWARE of non-post-C ё ю

Abstract = %{а%} %{э%} %{ү%} %{о%} %{й%} %{н%} %{з%} %{т%} ;
AbstractVow = %{а%} %{э%} %{ү%} %{о%} ;
AbstractCns = %{й%} %{н%} %{з%} %{т%} ;


Rules

"Deletion of {и} at end of word (i.e., in stand-alone forms)"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;

"Deletion of {r} before suffix" ! FIXME
%{r%}:0 <=> _ %>: ; 
        except 
            _ %>: (:0) [ :д | %{I%}: ] ;
            _ %>: %{s%}: ;  ! don't delete {r} in px3 forms: гёзлерин

"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ [ :Cns (ь:) ] | й: | %{н%}: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{r%}: ] ] ] _ ;
            AbstractCns:/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %-: ] _ ;

"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :Vow ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ;
        [ AbstractCns: %{s%}: ]/[ [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{s%}: ] ] | %-: ] _ %{n%}: %>: ;
            except
             [ й:0 ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ;

"Deletion of {е} when a following vowel"
%{е%}:0 <=> _ [ :в :Vow ]/:0 ;

"Deletion of ь when vowel-initial stem follows"
! е behaves like a consonant after vowels; i.e., it's /йэ/
ь:0 <=> _ %>: [ :Vow - :е ]/[ :0 ] ;
       ! before consonants, but only when after more than one consonant
                    [ :Cns :Cns ]/:0 _ %>: :Cns/:0 ;
       ! delete in FrontVow Liquid ь _
        [ :FrontVow [ :л | :р ] ]/:0 _ [ :Cns | :Vow ]/:0 ;
       ! delete in VльлV
                      [ :Vow :л ]/:0 _ [ :л :Vow ]/:0 ;
       ! in Vнь*
                      [ :Vow :н ]/:0 _ %>: [ :Cns | :Vow ]/:0 ;
       
!       except
!             [ :а | :о | :у ] _ %>: [ :Vow ]/[ :0 ] ;
    except
        _ й: %>: %{E%}: ;
        :г _ %>: ;
        .#. :RdVow _ ;  ! уью
        !! ь deletes between consonants except for VCьC
        !! but ь deletes in Vльл
        ![ :Vow [ :Cns - :л ] ]/:0 _ [ :Cns - :л ]/:0 ;

"Intervocalic voicing of к"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ ([ :0 - %{❗%}:0 ]) %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          :Vow (:0) _ :ъ ([ :0 - %{❗%}:0 ]) %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          except
            %{❗%}:0 _ ;
          where Cx in ( к )
                Cy in ( г )
                matched;


"Intervocalic voicing of п"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ ([ :0 - %{❗%}:0 ]) %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          .#. :RdVow :ь (:0) _ ([ :0 - %{❗%}:0 ]) %>: (:0) :Vow ;  ! оьп>{I}п:оьбюп
          except
            %{❗%}:0 _ ;
!                    _ :0* %{I%}: :п ;
          where Cx in ( п )
                Cy in ( б )
                matched;

"Deletion of й before yoticised vowels when not earlier in a stem"
й:0 <=> _ %>: [ :YotVow ]/[ :0 ] ;
        _ %>: [ %{A%}: | %{E%}: | %{I%}: ] ;
        _ %{y%}:YotVow ;  ! and before {y}:ю
    except
        !!! in these situations there's no special letter !!!
        _ %>: [ %{I%}:ы | %{I%}:и ] ;


!!!!!!!!! Vowels !!!!!!!!!!
!!!
!!! Basic front vowel contexts
!!! includes и, е, э, аь, оь, уь
!!!  [ :FrontVow | [ :Vow :ь ] ]
!!!
!!! #includes оь, уь
!!! # [ :RdVow :ь ]
!!!
!!! Front-round vowel hack
!!! includes ю, ё
!!!  [ [ \[ .#. | :Vow ] ] :RdYotVow ]
!!!
!!!

"{E} is й after vowels"
%{E%}:й <=> :Vow/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ;
        except
            [ :Vow й: ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ;

!!!!!!!!! Vowel Harmony !!!!!!!!!!!

"{I} front unrounded harmony"
%{I%}:и <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ [ :Vow - [ :RdVow | :RdYotVow ] ] :ь ] ] :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
            ! ь only triggers front harmony when there's a consonant cluster before it
            [ :Cns :Cns ь:0 %>: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ ь:0 | Abstract: ] ] _ ;
            ! abstract vowels
                  [ %{э%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - AbstractVow: ] | %-: ]* _ ;

        except
                          %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ .#. ;
      [ [ :FrontVow | %{е%}:0 ] :в :Cns*  ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 | %{е%}: ] ] _ ;  ! -евни in Russian words
  [ :Cns :р %{☭%}: %>: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}: | %>: ] ] _ ;  ! центр and тигр take back vowels
        [ AbstractCns: %{s%}: ]/[ [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{s%}: ] ] | %-: ] _ %{n%}: %>: ;

"{I} front rounded harmony"
%{I%}:ю <=> [ [ :RdVow :ь ] :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
            [ [ :RdYotVow ] :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
   [ [ :FrontVow | %{е%}: ] :в :Cns*  ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{е%}: ] ] _ ;
            !!!!! following for ойу → ою !!!!!
          [ :RdVow :Cns* й:0 ]/[ :0 - [ й:0 | Abstract: ] ] _ ;
			   !!!!! following for юйю → юю !!!!!
       [ :RdYotVow :Cns* й:0 ]/[ :0 - [ й:0 | Abstract: ] ] _ ;
       [ :RdVow :ь :Cns* й:0 ]/[ :0 - [ й:0 | Abstract: ] ] _ ;
                           !!!!! following for ююню !!!!!
     [ :RdYotVow й:0 :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ й:0 | Abstract: ] ] _ ;  ! кююню
            ! abstract vowels
         [ %{ү%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - AbstractVow: ] | %-: ]* _ ;
        except
            %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ .#. ;
        [ [ :Vow - :RdYotVow ] :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
            .#. [ :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
             %{☭%}: :Cns*/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] - %{☭%}:0 ]* _ ;
         [ :FrontVow :в %{☭%}: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 ] ]* _ ;
      [ :RdYotVow :Cns* %{☭%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 ] ] _ ;  ! -ёрну in Russian words
       [ :Cns :Cns ь:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ ;
        [ AbstractCns: %{s%}: ]/[ [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{s%}: ] ] | %-: ] _ %{n%}: %>: ;

"{I} back rounded harmony"
%{I%}:у <=>        [ :RdVow :Cns [ :Cns | ь: ]* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
      :FrontVow [ :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
       :BackVow [ :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
            .#. [ :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;

    ! secondary rounding stuff
                  [ :BackVow :в :Cns*  ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{е%}: ] ] _ ;
          [ :BackVow :YotVow :в :Cns*  ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{е%}: ] ] _ ;
               [ .#. :YotVow :в :Cns*  ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{е%}: ] ] _ ;

       :RdYotVow [ :Cns :Cns* %{☭%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] - %{☭%}:0 ] _ ;  ! -ёрну in Russian words
       :RdYotVow [ :Cns* %{☭%}:0 :Cns :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] - %{☭%}:0 ] _ ;  ! -ёрну in Russian words
		 ! need the above two rules because there needs to be at least one consonant, but it doesn't matter which side of {☭} it is; could combine to one rule with | between the two contexts, but I don't think it's possible to simplify it, e.g. "either :Cns before {☭} or :Cns after {☭}, with optional :Cns* either side"
            ! abstract vowels
         [ %{о%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - AbstractVow: ] | %-: ]* _ ;

        except
                       %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ .#. ;
            [ [ :RdVow :ь ] :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
       :а :в %{☭%}: :Cns*/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 | %{е%}: ] ]* _ ;  !  -авны, -овну
   [ [ :FrontVow | %{е%}: ] :в :Cns*  ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{е%}: ] ] _ ;
          [ :RdVow :Cns* й:0 ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | й:0 ] ] _ ;  ! ойу > ою
       [ :Cns :Cns ь:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | ь:0 ] ] _ ;
     [ :RdYotVow (й:0) :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | й:0 ] ] _ ;  ! кююню
        [ AbstractCns: %{s%}: ]/[ [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{s%}: ] ] | %-: ] _ %{n%}: %>: ;

!"Abstract vowel harmony for {I} after {а}"
!%{I%}:ы  <=> [ %{а%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ;





"{A} front unrounded harmony"
%{A%}:е <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ :Vow :ь ] ] :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
                          [ [ :RdVow :ь ] :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
      [ [ [ \[ .#. | :Vow ] ] :RdYotVow ] :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
    ! ь only triggers front harmony when there's a consonant cluster before it
                     [ :Cns :Cns ь:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ ;
                           !!!!! following for ююню !!!!!
      [ :RdYotVow (й:0) :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ;  ! кююню 
!                                         %{э%}: (%-) %>: :Cns* _ ; 
            ! abstract vowels
 [ [ %{э%}:0 | %{ү%}:0 ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - AbstractVow: ] | %-: ]* _ ;
        except
       [ :RdYotVow :Cns* %{☭%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}:0 ] _ ;  ! -ёрлар in Russian words
                          [ :Cns :р %{☭%}: %>: :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;  ! центр and тигр take back vowels
         [ [ :Vow - :RdYotVow ] :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;  ! for some reason the rule above doesn't exclude this condition  e.g., боюнгъа
                          [ :Vow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;

"{E} front harmony"
%{E%}:е <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ :Vow :ь ] ] :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
                          [ [ :RdVow :ь ] :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
      [ [ [ \[ .#. | :Vow ] ] :RdYotVow ] :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
      [ [ [ \[ .#. | :Vow ] ] :RdYotVow ] :Cns* й:0 ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ; ! сюй>E>мIн:сюемин
        except
       [ :RdYotVow :Cns* %{☭%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}:0 ] _ ;  ! -ёрлар in Russian words
!                                        :Vow/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ;


"{E} back й harmony"
%{E%}:я <=> [ :BackVow й:0 ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ;





!!!!!!!!! Cons - VH interaction !!!!!!!!!

"Delete ъ in front vowel context and after г:0"
%{ъ%}:0 <=> [ [ [ %{э%}: | :FrontVow ] | [ :Vow :ь ] ] :Cns* [ :г | :к ]  ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{ъ%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                          [ [ :RdVow :ь ] :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
      [ [ [ \[ .#. | :Vow ] ] :RdYotVow ] :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ] _ ;
                                                      г:0 _ ;
    ! ь only triggers front harmony when there's a consonant cluster before it
                     [ :Cns :Cns ь:0 :Cns* ]/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ ;
            ! abstract vowels
 [ [ %{э%}:0 | %{ү%}:0 ] :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - AbstractVow: ] | %-: ]* _ ;
      [ :RdYotVow (й:0) :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :0 - й:0 ] _ ;  ! сюювге
        except
                          [ :Cns :р %{☭%}: %>: :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;  ! центр and тигр take back vowels
                         [ [ :Vow - :RdYotVow ] :RdYotVow :Cns :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;  ! for some reason the rule above doesn't exclude this condition  e.g., боюнгъа


!!!!!!!!! Special stuff for px+case !!!!!!!!!

"Deletion of {n} word final"
%{n%}:0 <=>  _ (:0) .#. ;

"Deletion of accusative and genitive {D} after {n}"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: (%{ң%}:) .#. ;
            %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: (%{ң%}:) .#. ;

"Deletion of {A} after vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :Vow ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;

"Deletion of {I} after {n}"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ .#. ;
            except
                         %{o%}:0 _ ;

"Deletion of dative г after px1sg, px2sg, px3sp"
г:0 <=>  %{I%}: :Nasals (:г) %>: _ %{ъ%}: %{A%}: .#. ;
         %{I%}: :Nasals (:г) %>: _ %{ъ%}: %{A%}: %  ;

"Epenthesis in some stems"
%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"Epenthetic {y} is ю after й"
%{y%}:ю <=> й: _ ;
        except
            _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;


!!!!!!!! Passive !!!!!!!!

"Passive morpheme is н after stems whose last consonant is л"
%{l%}:н <=> [ :л :Vow ]/:0 _ ;
